Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2673.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Study committee on inmate mental health services; membership; duties; reports; delayed repeal A. The study committee on inmate mental health services is established consisting of the following members: 1. Two members of the house of representatives who are from different political parties and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 2. Two members of the senate who are from different political parties and who are appointed by the president of the senate. The president of the senate shall designate one member to serve as cochairperson of the committee. 3. The director of the state department of corrections or the director's designee. 4. The director of the Arizona health care cost containment system administration or the director's designee. 5. The following members who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives: (a) One member who represents the regional behavioral health authority. (b) One member with a family member who is currently in jail or prison and who has a mental health diagnosis. (c) One member who is a prosecutor with a city, town or county or this state and who prosecutes defendants with mental illness. (d) One member who represents a law enforcement agency from a county with a population of less than one million persons. 6. The following members who are appointed by the president of the senate: (a) One member who is employed by a special health care district. (b) One member who is an attorney with experience representing mentally ill defendants who are in jail or who are sentenced to prison. (c) One member who represents a law enforcement agency from a county with a population of one million persons or more. B. The committee shall meet at least once each year at a date and time determined by the committee. C. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. The committee shall: 1. Examine ways to improve the screening process for individuals who are arrested and taken to jail or prison. 2. Study and recommend ways to improve access to adequate mental health screenings for individuals who are in jail or prison. 3. Study and address ways to improve screenings for mental health risks, including dangers to the individual and others, for individuals who are in jail or prison. 4. On or before December 31, 2026 and December 31, 2027, submit a report regarding the committee's activities and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. E. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.